Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201666-1014
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Low-Income Home Energy Conservation Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Revenue;

(2) Eligible energy conservation grant means a grant paid
to an eligible person for an eligible energy conservation improvement;

(3) Eligible energy conservation improvement means a device,
a method, equipment, or material that reduces consumption of or increases
efficiency in the use of electricity or natural gas for a residence owned
by an eligible person, including, but not limited to, insulation and ventilation,
storm or thermal doors or windows, awnings, caulking and weatherstripping,
furnace efficiency modifications, thermostat or lighting controls, replacement
or modification of lighting fixtures or bulbs to increase the energy efficiency
of the home's lighting system, and systems to turn off or vary the delivery
of energy;

(4) Eligible entity means an entity providing funds pursuant to section 66-1015
and which is a public power district organized under Chapter 70, article 6,
a rural public power district organized under Chapter 70, article 8, an electric
cooperative corporation organized under the Electric Cooperative Corporation
Act, a nonprofit corporation organized for the purpose of furnishing electric
service, a joint entity organized under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, or
a municipality;

(5) Eligible person means any resident of Nebraska who owns
his or her residence and whose household income is at or below one hundred
fifty percent of the federal poverty level, as determined in accordance with
the Low-Income Home Energy Conservation Act;
and

(6) Fiscal
year means the state fiscal year which is the period July 1 to the following
June 30.

Laws 2008, LB1001, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB385, § 2.
July 1, 2019
Electric Cooperative Corporation Act, see section 70-701.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.